District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34k

Maintenance of documents.

Copies of the specimen Bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 12, 57 DCR 9873
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 12 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 12 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-573, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10090).